Wyoming, session 2025, HB0009.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 15-1-103(a)(xiii) and 18-2-101 by
creating a new subsection (b) are amended to read:

15-1-103. General powers of governing bodies.

(a) The governing bodies of all cities and towns may:

HB0009

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0254
(xiii) License, tax and regulate any business
whatsoever conducted or trafficked in within the limits of
the city or town for the purpose of raising revenue, and
any license taxes imposed shall be uniform in respect to
the class of business upon which imposed.; No license,
permit or other authorization shall be required for a
business that is operated:

(A) Only occasionally. For purposes of this
subparagraph, "occasionally" means that the business is not
a habitual or regular activity of the operator; and

(B) By an operator who has not attained the
age of eighteen (18) years.

18-2-101. General powers.

(b) No board of county commissioners shall require a
license, permit or other authorization for a business that
is operated:

HB0009

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0254
(i) Only occasionally. For purposes of this
paragraph, "occasionally" means as defined in W.S.
15-1-103(a)(xiii)(A); and

(ii) By a person who has not attained the age of
eighteen (18) years.

Section 2. This act is effective July 1, 2025.

(END)
HB0009